src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kilgool: # MLO, ok Only short form 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    kilgool+N+Sg+Nom: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Gen: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Acc: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Ill: kiˊlgolân
    kilgool+N+Sg+Loc: kiˊlgolist
    kilgool+N+Sg+Com: kiˊlgoláin
    kilgool+N+Sg+Abe: kilgoolttáá
    kilgool+N+Ess: kiˊlgolin
    kilgool+N+Par: kiˊlgolid
    kilgool+N+Pl+Nom: kiˊlgoleh
    kilgool+N+Pl+Gen: kiˊlgolij
    kilgool+N+Pl+Acc: kiˊlgolijd
    kilgool+N+Pl+Ill: kiˊlgoláid
    kilgool+N+Pl+Loc: kiˊlgolijn
    kilgool+N+Pl+Com: kiˊlgolijguin
    kilgool+N+Pl+Abe: kiˊlgolijttáá

  Noun - čohhoom: # MLO, ok 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: [čohomân, čoˊhomân]
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: [čohomist, čoˊhomist]
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: [čohomáin, čoˊhomáin]
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: [čohomin, čoˊhomin]
    čohhoom+N+Par: [čohomid, čoˊhomid]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: [čohomeh, čoˊhomeh]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: [čohomij, čoˊhomij]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: [čohomijd, čoˊhomijd]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: [čohomáid, čoˊhomáid]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: [čohomijn, čoˊhomijn]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: [čohomijguin, čoˊhomijguin]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: [čohomijttáá, čoˊhomijttáá]

  Noun - kolgooh: # MLO, ok Only short
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Nom: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Gen: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Acc: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Ill: koˊlgohân
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Loc: koˊlgohist
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Com: koˊlgoháin
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Abe: kolgoohttáá
    kolgooh+N+Ess: koˊlgohin
    kolgooh+N+Par: koˊlgohid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Nom: koˊlgoheh
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Gen: koˊlgohij
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Acc: koˊlgohijd
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Ill: koˊlgoháid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Loc: koˊlgohijn
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Com: koˊlgohijguin
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Abe: koˊlgohijttáá

  Noun - iššeed: # MLO, ok
    iššeed+N+Sg+Nom: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Gen: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Acc: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Ill: [iṣ̌edân, iˊṣ̌edân]
    iššeed+N+Sg+Loc: [iṣ̌edist, iˊṣ̌edist]
    iššeed+N+Sg+Com: [iṣ̌edáin,iˊṣ̌edáin]
    iššeed+N+Sg+Abe: iššeedttáá
    iššeed+N+Ess: [iṣ̌edin, iˊṣ̌edin]
    iššeed+N+Par: [iṣ̌edid, iˊṣ̌edid]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Nom: [iṣ̌edeh, iˊṣ̌edeh]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Gen: [iṣ̌edij, iˊṣ̌edij]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Acc: [iṣ̌edijd, iˊṣ̌edijd]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Ill: [iṣ̌edáid, iˊṣ̌edáid]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Loc: [iṣ̌edijn, iˊṣ̌edijn]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Com: [iṣ̌edijguin, iˊṣ̌edijguin]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Abe: [iṣ̌edijttáá, iˊṣ̌edijttáá]

  Noun - vinnjooh: # 1B - MLO, ok; short
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Nom: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Gen: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Acc: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Ill: viˊṇjohân
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Loc: viˊṇjohist
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Com: viˊṇjoháin
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Abe: vinnjoohttáá
    vinnjooh+N+Ess:    viˊṇjohin
    vinnjooh+N+Par:    viˊṇjohid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Nom: viˊṇjoheh
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Gen: viˊṇjohij
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Acc: viˊṇjohijd
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Ill: viˊṇjoháid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Loc: viˊṇjohijn
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Com: viˊṇjohijguin
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Abe: viˊṇjohijttáá

  Noun - suuhâm: # MLO, ok; only short
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Nom: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Gen: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Acc: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Ill: suhâmân
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Loc: suhâmist
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Com: suhâmáin
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Abe: suuhâmttáá
    suuhâm+N+Ess: suhâmin
    suuhâm+N+Par: suhâmid
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Nom: suhâmeh
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Gen: suhâmij
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Acc: suhâmijd
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Ill: suhâmáid
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Loc: suhâmijn
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Com: suhâmijguin
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Abe: suhâmijttáá

  Noun - mááccuh: # MLO, ok 1B The first lexicon for mááccuh is LITTER; only short
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Nom: mááccuh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Gen: mááccuh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Acc: mááccuh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Ill: mácuhân
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Loc: mácuhist
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Com: mácuháin
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Abe: mááccuhttáá
    mááccuh+v2+N+Ess: mácuhin
    mááccuh+v2+N+Par: mácuhid
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Nom: mácuheh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Gen: mácuhij
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Acc: mácuhijd
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Ill: mácuháid
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Loc: mácuhijn
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Com: mácuhijguin

  Noun - iilâsk: # MLO, ok; only short 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Nom: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Gen: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Acc: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Ill: ilâskân
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Loc: ilâskist
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Com: ilâskáin
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Abe: iilâskttáá
    iilâsk+N+Ess: ilâskin
    iilâsk+N+Par: ilâskid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Nom: ilâskeh
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Gen: ilâskij
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Acc: ilâskijd
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Ill: ilâskáid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Loc: ilâskijn
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Com: ilâskijguin
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Abe: ilâskijttáá
